Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Chapter 61. Mississippi Business Investment Act

§ 57-61-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Mississippi Business Investment Act.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 419, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 31, 1986).

§ 57-61-3.
Purpose of chapter.

It is the purpose of this chapter to promote business and economic development in the State of Mississippi through job producing programs and by providing loans to municipalities as defined in this chapter; to assist in securing strategic investments and/or investments in small communities by private companies locating or expanding in the state; to promote the improvement and enhancement of facilities utilized in foreign and domestic commerce to and from Mississippi through state-owned ports and to provide loans to state agencies as defined in this chapter, for the construction and development of harbor, channel and port facilities; and to authorize the issuance of state bonds or notes for funding of said programs.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 419, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 31, 1986).

§ 57-61-5.
Definitions.

The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Department” means the Mississippi Department of Economic Development.

“Board” means the Mississippi Department of Economic Development operating through its executive director.

“Improvements” means the construction, rehabilitation or repair of drainage systems; energy facilities (power generation and distribution); fire safety facilities (excluding vehicles); sewer systems (pipe treatment); transportation directly affecting the site of the proposed investment, including roads, sidewalks, bridges, rail, port, river, airport or pipeline (excluding vehicles); bulkheads; buildings; and facilities necessary to accommodate a United States Navy home port; and means land reclamation; waste disposal; water supply (storage, treatment and distribution); land acquisition; and the dredging of channels and basins.

“Municipality” means any county or any incorporated city, or town, acting individually or jointly, or any agency of the State of Mississippi operating a state-owned port.

“Private company” means any agricultural, aquacultural, maricultural, industrial, manufacturing, service, tourism, or research and development enterprise or enterprises. The term “private company” shall not include any retail trade enterprise except regional shopping malls having a minimum capital investment of One Hundred Million Dollars ($100,000,000.00). No more than fifteen percent (15%) of the aggregate funds made available under this chapter shall be used to fund aquacultural, maricultural and tourism enterprises. The funds made available to tourism enterprises under this chapter shall be limited to infrastructure improvements and to the acquisition of land and shall not be made available to fund tourism promotions or to fund the construction, improvement or acquisition of hotels and/or motels or to finance or refinance any obligations of hotels and/or motels.

“Governmental unit” means a department or subsidiary of the United States government, or an agency of the State of Mississippi operating a state-owned port.

“Private match” means any new private investment by the private company and/or governmental unit in land, buildings, depreciable fixed assets, and improvements of the project used to match improvements funded under this chapter. The term “private match” includes improvements made prior to March 31, 1986, pursuant to contracts entered into contingent upon assistance being made available under this chapter.

“Publicly owned property” means property which is owned by the local, state or United States government and is not under the control of a private company.

“Director” means the Executive Director of the Department of Economic Development.

“Small community” means a county with a population of twenty-five thousand (25,000) or less; or a municipality with a population of ten thousand (10,000) or less and any area within five (5) miles of the limits of such municipality, according to the most recent federal decennial census.

“Strategic investment” means an investment by the private and public sectors that will have a major impact on job creation and maintenance in the state of no less than one hundred fifty (150) jobs, that will have a major impact on enlargement and enhancement of international and foreign trade and commerce to and from the State of Mississippi, or which is considered to be unique to the state and have statewide or regional impact as determined by the department.

“Seller” means the State Bond Commission or the State Development Bank.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 419, § 3; Laws, 1987, ch. 302, § 2; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 70; Laws, 1988, ch. 569, § 2; Laws, 1988, ch. 586; Laws, 1989, ch. 523, § 1; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 71, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved June 30, 1990).

§ 57-61-7.
Establishment of Business Investment Program.

There is hereby established, under the direction of the department, a program to be known as the Business Investment Program for the purpose of making grants or loans to municipalities in order to install and effect specific improvements and projects necessary to complement industrial investment by private companies, the federal government or municipalities which increase Mississippi’s share of domestic, international and foreign commerce to create and maintain new full-time jobs.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 419, § 4; Laws, 1989, ch. 523, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 4, 1989).

§ 57-61-9.
Letters of intent to locate, expand, or build within municipality; applications for loans or grants; maximum amount of loans; projects involving port facilities.

Any private company desiring assistance from a municipality shall submit to the municipality a letter of intent to locate, expand or build a facility entirely or partially within the municipality or on land the municipality is authorized to own or otherwise acquire. The letter of intent shall include:

Except for strategic investments, a commitment that the proposed project will create and maintain a minimum of ten (10) net new full-time equivalent jobs, will create and maintain at least a five percent (5%) increase in full-time equivalent jobs in the case of expansion of an enterprise already located at the site or at least a twenty-five percent (25%) increase in full-time equivalent jobs pursuant to subsection (9) of Section 57-61-15 and will create and maintain at least one (1) net new full-time equivalent job for every Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) either loaned or granted for the project. The commitment required by this paragraph (a) shall include any jobs created prior to March 31, 1986, resulting from contracts entered into contingent upon assistance being made available under this chapter. All jobs required to be maintained by this paragraph (a) shall be maintained until such time as any loan made under this chapter for the benefit of a private company is repaid.

A statement that the specific improvements are necessary for the efficient and cost-effective operation of the private company, together with supporting financial and engineering documentation.

Any commitment to pay rental on, or to make loan repayments related to, the improvements to be made with funds loaned to a municipality under this chapter.

If required by the Mississippi Development Authority, a notarized statement of willingness to grant a lien on the facility for which the improvement is being provided, in an amount and a manner to be determined by the Mississippi Development Authority, which lien may be foreclosed in the event that the private company fails to operate in the facility according to the terms of the agreement and/or to collateralize the loan made for the benefit of the private company for which the improvement is being provided in an amount and manner to be determined by the Mississippi Development Authority. In the event the contractual agreement is to be entered into with a department or subsidiary of the United States government, the Mississippi Development Authority shall determine that the governmental unit will operate the proposed project for a sufficient number of years to retire the loan based on increased revenue estimates by the University Research Center and any agreement entered into shall reflect that the interest paid on any loan for such purpose shall be included in Mississippi’s contributory value in the project. In the event the private company requesting the assistance is a subsidiary of another corporation, if required by the Mississippi Development Authority, any contractual agreement entered into shall also require the parent company to unconditionally warrant the performance of the subsidiary in carrying out the terms of the agreement or it shall require the subsidiary and/or the parent company to pledge assets in an amount and a manner to be determined by the Mississippi Development Authority and/or to collateralize the loan in an amount and a manner to be determined by the Mississippi Development Authority to ensure the performance of the terms of the contract.

Upon receipt of the letter of intent from a private company, the municipality may apply to the Mississippi Development Authority for a loan or grant. The application from the municipality shall include, but not be limited to:

A statement of the purpose of the proposed loan or grant, including a list of eligible items and the cost of each.

A statement showing the sources of funding for the entire project, including the private company’s or governmental unit’s investment in the project and any public and other private sources of funding.

A certified copy of the signed letter of intent from a private company or governmental unit, as specified in this section.

Evidence that there will be a private match of at least Three Dollars ($3.00) for every One Dollar ($1.00) of state assistance, except:

In the case of ports the private match will be at least Two Dollars ($2.00) for every One Dollar ($1.00) of state assistance; and

In the case where the Mississippi Development Authority determines that a private company is a high technology enterprise the private match will be at least Two Dollars ($2.00) for every One Dollar ($1.00) of state assistance.

The Mississippi Development Authority shall establish criteria for determining whether a private company is a high technology enterprise.

Demonstration that the private company is financially sound and is likely to fulfill the commitments made in its letter of intent.

A proposed timetable for the provision of the improvements.

Evidence that the project will be expeditiously carried out and completed as planned.

A demonstration that insufficient local capital improvement funds at reasonable rates and terms are available within the necessary time to provide the needed improvement on public property. This includes local funds available through issuance of bonds or other means, state funds available through existing programs, and available federal program funds such as community development block grant funds, urban development action grant funds, and economic development administration funds.

A demonstration that insufficient private funds are available at reasonable rates and terms within the necessary time to fund improvement on property owned by the private company.

The Mississippi Development Authority shall consider grant and loan applications based on the following criteria:

The number of net new full-time equivalent jobs that will be provided and the amount of additional state and local tax revenue estimated by the University Research Center to be directly generated by the private company’s new investment, and additionally, as to loan applications by state agencies, the extent to which shipping through the port will be increased by the proposed port development projects, the degree to which jobs will be increased in the port area and the impact on port revenues.

The ability to repay the principal and interest, in the case of a loan, based on increased revenue estimates and any revenue-producing provision of a contractual agreement.

The increase in the employment base of the state.

The Mississippi Development Authority and the University Research Center may use the resources and capabilities of the planning and development districts in carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

No loan shall be made in excess of the amounts which can be repaid with the increased revenues estimated by the University Research Center, provided that this subsection (4) shall not apply to loans in connection with a United States Navy home port.

Notwithstanding anything contained in this chapter, an agency of the State of Mississippi operating a state-owned port, and hereinabove identified as a “municipality” and “governmental unit” for purposes of this chapter, may make application for a loan or grant under the terms and provisions of this chapter. In addition, a public agency operating a port bordering on the Gulf of Mexico, which shall be considered to be a “municipality” or a “governmental unit” for the purposes of this chapter, may make application for a loan or grant under the terms and provisions of this chapter from funds other than those funds authorized for a state-owned port under paragraph (e)(iii) of Section 57-61-11. The application shall be initiated by submission of a letter of intent to engage in a project or projects for the purpose of effecting enlargement and improvement in all facilities used and useful in attracting international and foreign commerce through the port. Projects eligible for inclusion in the letter of intent may include, but not be restricted to:

Dredging and deepening the access channel and harbor basin of the port;

Effecting the enlargement of the land area of the port by reclamation;

Construction and installation of piling, bulkheads, docks, wharves, warehouses and appurtenances; and

Acquisition of facilities and equipment for handling bulk and containerized cargo.

With respect to a state-owned port bordering on the Gulf of Mexico, the letter of intent shall include the following information and any other information required by the Mississippi Development Authority:

Present and future annual tonnages expected as a result of the improvements.

Reasons why present facilities are inadequate to enable the port to compete, including limitations imposed by insufficient depth of channel and basin.

Increased channel and basin depths necessary to accommodate modern shipping.

Comparison of the percentage of the world’s cargo shipping that can now be accommodated with what could be accommodated with project improvements.

Economic contribution to the region and state resulting from increased shipping activity.

Statement of degree to which port revenues are expected to be increased as a result of projects.

Financial data of port activities, including cost of project, degree of federal funding available and required local participation.

On or before January 1, 1989, a state-owned port described in this paragraph (b) shall submit to the Senate Finance Committee and the House Ways and Means Committee of the Mississippi Legislature a comprehensive, written report updating for each committee the information listed in items (i) through (vii) of this paragraph (b) with particular emphasis on the economic contribution to the region and state by shipping activity at the port; on financial data with respect to the degree of federal funding available and local participation in funding port activities; and on progress made in dredging and completing other improvements necessary to accommodate modern shipping.

The Mississippi Development Authority shall consider grant and loan applications based on the following:

The extent to which shipping through the port will be increased by the proposed projects.

The degree to which jobs will be increased in the port area.

Impact on port revenues.

The ability of the port to repay interest and principal in the case of a loan.

A municipality may apply to the Mississippi Development Authority for a grant under the terms and provisions of this chapter, and the Mississippi Development Authority may award grants to a municipality subject to limitations contained in this chapter. The application shall be initiated by submission of a letter of intent to engage in a project or projects for the purpose of providing improvements necessary to accommodate a United States Navy home port.

The Legislature hereby finds and determines that financing facilities necessary to accommodate a Navy home port serves a valid public purpose in that a Navy home port will significantly contribute to the employment base of the state which is in great need of assistance; provided, that in the event such facilities are no longer required for use by the Navy as a home port, such facilities shall revert as provided in Section 59-9-21.

Notwithstanding any provision or requirement of this chapter to the contrary, a municipality may make application for a loan under this chapter, in an amount not to exceed Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00), for the purpose of acquiring and developing land to be used as a technology/industrial park for which there is a binding commitment by one or more private companies to create and maintain not less than an aggregate of three hundred (300) jobs meeting minimum criteria established by the Mississippi Development Authority. Such a commitment by a private company shall not disqualify the private company from obtaining assistance under this section. The match requirements of this section shall not apply to any loan made pursuant to this subsection (8).

Notwithstanding any provision or requirement of this chapter to the contrary, a municipality operating a county-owned port or municipally owned port may make application for a loan under this chapter, in an amount not to exceed Three Million Dollars ($3,000,000.00), for the purpose of acquiring land, buildings and other improvements and for repairing, renovating, maintaining and improving such a port.

A municipality is authorized to negotiate a contract for the acquisition, construction and erection of a project or any portion of a project hereunder where a municipality finds that, because of the particular nature of a project or any portion thereof, it would be in the best public interest of the municipality to negotiate.

Contracts by a private company for the acquisition, construction or erection of a project which receives assistance under this chapter shall be effected in the manner prescribed by law for public contracts, unless the Mississippi Development Authority makes a written finding that, because of special circumstances with respect to the projects or any portion thereof, it would better serve the public interest or more effectively achieve the purposes of this chapter to enter into such contracts based on negotiation.

A municipality is authorized upon such terms and conditions as the municipality may deem advisable, provided such terms and conditions shall not be in conflict with the provisions of this chapter, to (a) acquire, whether by construction, purchase, gift or lease, all of or any portion of a project hereunder; (b) to lease or sell to others all of or any portion of a project hereunder; and (c) to lend to the private company the proceeds of the loan from the board to such municipality.

All agreements between a municipality and a private company related directly or indirectly to a project or a portion of a project to be funded in whole or in part under this chapter are subject to approval by the Mississippi Development Authority.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 419, § 5; Laws, 1987, ch. 302, § 3; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 71; Laws, 1988, ch. 569, § 3; Laws, 1989, ch. 523, § 3; Laws, 1990, ch. 570, § 7; Laws, 1991, ch. 432, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 548 § 4; Laws, 1994, ch. 626, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 307, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 586, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 534, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2003.

§ 57-61-11.
Guidelines, rules, and regulations for repayment of funds.

The Mississippi Development Authority shall establish such guidelines, rules and regulations for the repayment of funds loaned pursuant to this chapter as may be necessary. These provisions shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

Funds may be loaned for a maximum of ten (10) years or the estimated useful life of the property as established by the United States Department of Treasury, whichever is greater.

The rate of interest charged by the Mississippi Development Authority for improvements not on publicly owned property may be negotiated by the Mississippi Development Authority.

For all improvements funded through this chapter which occur on publicly owned property, repayment of funds loaned may, in the discretion of the Mississippi Development Authority, involve only the principal amount loaned with no interest charged thereon.

An audit by a certified public accountant of all costs of a project hereunder must be submitted to the Mississippi Development Authority not later than ninety (90) days after a project’s completion. Such an audit shall certify that all of the funds loaned or granted pursuant to this chapter were disbursed in accordance with the terms of this chapter and shall be paid for by the private company benefited by the project. In addition to the audit required under this paragraph, the State Auditor may conduct performance and compliance audits under this chapter according to Section 7-7-211(o) and may bill the oversight agency.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the case of an application under Section 57-61-9(5) (a), the guidelines shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

Funds may be loaned for a maximum of twenty (20) years, or the estimated useful life of improvements on the land areas of the port, whichever is greater.

The rate of interest charged by the Mississippi Development Authority for loans for port projects may be negotiated by the Mississippi Development Authority and shall be consistent with Section 57-61-11(b) and (c).

The total of grants and loans to any one (1) state-owned port made pursuant to an application under Section 57-61-9(5)(a) shall not exceed Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00).

Before any loan or grant may be made under Section 57-61-9(5)(a) to a state-owned port bordering the Gulf of Mexico, the applicant shall make adequate assurance to the Mississippi Development Authority that federal participation in the cost of the project or projects has been committed contingent only upon availability of local participation in accordance with federal guidelines.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the Mississippi Development Authority shall utilize not more than Four Million Dollars ($4,000,000.00) out of the proceeds of bonds authorized to be issued in this chapter to be made available as interest-bearing loans to state-owned ports for the purpose of repairing, renovating, maintaining and improving the state-owned port. The Mississippi Development Authority shall establish an amortization schedule for the repayment of any loans made pursuant to this subparagraph. The state-owned port shall not spend any revenues for other purposes unless payments on the loan are being timely made according to the amortization schedule. The match requirements of this section and Section 57-61-9 shall not apply to any loan made pursuant to this subparagraph.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the Mississippi Development Authority shall utilize not more than Three Million Dollars ($3,000,000.00) out of the proceeds of bonds authorized to be issued in this chapter for the purpose of making loans to municipalities operating county-owned ports or municipally owned ports for the purpose of acquiring land, buildings and other improvements and for repairing, renovating, maintaining and improving such ports. The Mississippi Development Authority shall establish an amortization schedule for the repayment of any loans made pursuant to this paragraph (f). A municipality shall not spend any port revenues for other purposes unless payments on the loan are being timely made according to the amortization schedule.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 419, § 6; Laws, 1987, ch. 524; Laws, 1989, ch. 523, § 4; Laws, 1990, ch. 570, § 8; Laws, 1991, ch. 458, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 548 § 5; Laws, 2003, ch. 534, § 2; Laws, 2014, ch. 427, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 57-61-13.
Preferences in grants with respect to enterprise zones and certain municipalities.

Grants for improvements on publicly owned property necessary to complete eligible projects, consistent with the criteria set forth in this chapter, shall be given preference in enterprise zones designated as such by the board in the case of a strategic investment or in those municipalities which are experiencing three (3) or more of the following problems:

Twenty percent (20%) or more of the population with income below the poverty level as reported in the most recent federal decennial census.

The unemployment rate of the county is at least two percent (2%) greater than the state unemployment rate as reported by the Mississippi Employment Security Commission.

Five percent (5%) or more loss of population between 1970 and 1980 as reported by the Bureau of the Census of the United States Department of Commerce.

Significant business vacancy rate within the area, either in gross footage or acreage or in the number of business or industrial buildings.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 419, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved March 31, 1986).

§ 57-61-14.
Purchase of tangible personal property or services by private company with proceeds of bonds exempt from sales tax.

In accordance with Section 27-65-111, purchases of tangible personal property or services by a private company, as defined in this chapter, with proceeds of bonds issued under this chapter, shall be exempt from sales tax.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 548, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 19, 1993).

§ 57-61-15.
Allocation of bond proceeds; lien requirements; effect of failure to create predicted jobs; effect of failure to meet repayment obligations; assistance for firms currently operating elsewhere in state.

Except for grants authorized for state-owned ports and for grants authorized under Section 57-61-32, Section 57-61-33 and Section 57-61-36, Mississippi Code of 1972, no more than Seven Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($7,500,000.00) of the proceeds of bonds authorized to be issued under this chapter shall be made available for grants to municipalities; however, Two Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($2,500,000.00) of such amount shall be made available for grants to small communities.

In no case shall any municipality receive more than one (1) grant in any single fiscal year. This subsection shall not apply to grants authorized under Section 57-61-36, Mississippi Code of 1972.

A minimum of twenty-five percent (25%) of the aggregate funds made available under this chapter shall be allocated to small communities. For the purpose of determining the aggregate funds available to make the allocation established in this subsection, there shall be excluded from inclusion therein any funds specifically dedicated pursuant to Sections 57-61-11(e) (iii) and (v), 57-61-32, 57-61-33, 57-61-34, 57-61-36, 57-61-39, 57-61-41 and 57-75-27, Mississippi Code of 1972.

No loan or grant shall be made without substantiation of the provisions of Section 57-61-9, Mississippi Code of 1972.

Except in the case of an application pursuant to Section 57-61-9(5)(a), Mississippi Code of 1972, funds loaned shall be secured by a lien and/or collateralized consistent with Section 57-61-9(1)(d), Mississippi Code of 1972, if required by the Mississippi Development Authority.

Except in the case of an application pursuant to Section 57-61-9(5)(a), Mississippi Code of 1972, private companies which fail to create and maintain the number of jobs specified in an approved application shall be liable for, in the discretion of the Mississippi Development Authority, (a) a penalty equal to two percent (2%) greater than the current prime interest rate for the remainder of the loan made for their benefit, or (b) prepayment of the outstanding loan amount incurred by the municipality for their benefit, unless the penalty or a portion thereof is waived by the Mississippi Development Authority because the failure is due to circumstances outside the control of the private company. The penalty shall be payable in installments which the Mississippi Development Authority deems appropriate. Immediate notice of penalties and waivers of penalties, including the penalties in Section 57-61-9(1)(d), Mississippi Code of 1972, with the reasons thereof, shall be submitted by the Mississippi Development Authority to the Governor and the Legislature along with the Mississippi Development Authority’s decision on the imposition of penalties and the reasons for this decision.

Except in the case of an application pursuant to Section 57-61-9(5)(a), Mississippi Code of 1972, municipalities receiving loans which fail to meet their repayment obligations shall forfeit the right to receive their sales tax allocation and/or homestead exemption reimbursement in an amount sufficient to repay obligations due until such time as their indebtedness has been discharged or arrangements to discharge such indebtedness satisfactory to the Mississippi Development Authority have been made. Sales tax allocations and/or homestead exemption reimbursements forfeited hereby shall, upon demand by the Mississippi Development Authority made in writing upon the State Tax Commission, be paid to the Mississippi Development Authority and applied to the discharge of the obligation. The Mississippi Development Authority may prescribe such other penalties it deems necessary.

Any municipality which has forfeited its sales tax allocation and/or homestead exemption reimbursement for twelve (12) months may levy an ad valorem tax on the taxable property therein for the purpose of meeting its repayment obligation. The revenue produced from the tax levy shall not be included within the ten percent (10%) growth limitation on ad valorem tax receipts for its general budget.

This chapter is expressly not intended to encourage the relocation of a company from one (1) jurisdiction within the state to another. Any request by a local sponsor for assistance to be provided a firm which currently operates a similar business in the state must be accompanied by a demonstration that the total net increase in and maintenance of full-time equivalent jobs, using the current number of jobs in all similar businesses operated by the private company in the state as a base, shall be at least twenty-five percent (25%). This requirement shall not apply to private companies relocating from small business incubators.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 419, § 8; Laws, 1989, ch. 523, § 5; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 71, § 18; Laws, 1993, ch. 548, § 3; Laws, 1995, ch. 548, § 4; Laws, 1996, ch. 553, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 541, § 4; Laws, 2003, ch. 502, § 5; Laws, 2006, ch. 530, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 343, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 14, 2007.).

§ 57-61-17.
Rulemaking authority of board; employment of professionals; annual reports; recordkeeping.

The board may prescribe such application forms and promulgate such guidelines, rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter with respect to loan and grant conditions and criteria for evaluation of the economic benefit of proposed loans and grants and for determining and evaluating compliance with all the criteria established in this chapter.

The board is authorized to engage legal services, financial advisors, appraisers and consultants, if needed, to review and close loans or grants made pursuant to this chapter. The cost of such professionals shall be paid by the borrower or from bond proceeds as determined and approved by the board.

On or before February 1, 1987, and on or before February 1 in each succeeding year in which loans are outstanding, the board shall provide the Legislature with a report on its activities for the preceding calendar year. The report shall contain, at a minimum, the following information:

A list of the approved projects including the municipality, name of private company or governmental unit, cost of each project, amount of private investment, projected number of new jobs, location of each project, date of submission of the application by the local sponsor, type of project and estimated completion date of each project.

A list of applications not approved.

A list of pending applications.

A list of projects where job projections are not being met or the project is not being completed and the penalty being applied or the reason a penalty is not being applied.

Estimates of state and local tax revenue increases caused directly by projects.

A list of projects approved or completed in years prior to the preceding year.

Guidelines issued for the Business Investment Program.

An overall statement of the progress of the program during the preceding year, along with recommendations for improvements.

The board shall accumulate from the municipalities having approved projects the following data on an annual and cumulative basis:

The number of jobs actually created by these projects.

Estimated increased tax revenue caused by the projects.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 419, § 9; Laws, 1992, ch. 461, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved May 5, 1992).

§ 57-61-19.
Certification of nondiscrimination as condition to loan.

No loan shall be made to a municipality under this chapter unless the municipality certifies to the department, in a form satisfactory to the department, that it shall not discriminate against any employee or against any applicant for employment because of race, religion, color, national origin, sex or age.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 419, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved March 31, 1986).

§ 57-61-21.
Creation of Mississippi Business Investment Fund and Mississippi Business Investment Sinking Fund; deposits and expenditures.

There is hereby created a special fund in the State Treasury to be known as the Mississippi Business Investment Fund dedicated to the purpose of providing grants and/or loans to municipalities for the purpose of providing for improvements authorized by this chapter. All monies received by the board to carry out the purposes of this chapter, by legislative appropriation, issuance of bonds or otherwise, shall be deposited into the Mississippi Business Investment Fund. Expenditures authorized herein shall be paid by the State Treasurer upon warrants drawn from the Mississippi Business Investment Fund, and the State Auditor, or his successor to such duties, shall issue warrants upon requisitions signed by the Chairman or Executive Director of the Mississippi Board of Economic Development.

Any monies repaid to the state from loans funded through the Mississippi Business Investment Fund shall be deposited into the Mississippi Business Investment Sinking Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury. Funds required in excess of the amounts available in the Mississippi Business Investment Sinking Fund to retire bonds issued pursuant to this chapter shall be appropriated from the State General Fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 419, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved March 31, 1986).

§ 57-61-23.
Payment of principal and interest on bonds and notes; cancellation of bonds and notes; annual reporting by State Treasurer; information to be included in executive budget; interest rate on loans.

All bonds issued under the authority of this chapter shall be redeemed at maturity, together with all interest due, from time to time, on the bonds, and these principal and interest payments shall be paid by appropriation from the Mississippi Business Investment Sinking Fund, and/or the State General Fund. All moneys paid into the Mississippi Business Investment Sinking Fund not appropriated to pay accruing bonds and interest shall be invested by the State Treasurer in such securities as are provided by law for the investment of the sinking funds of the state.

In the event that all or any part of the bonds and notes are purchased, they shall be canceled and returned to the loan and transfer agent as canceled and paid bonds and notes and thereafter all payments of interest thereon shall cease and the canceled bonds, notes and coupons together with any other canceled bonds, notes and coupons shall be destroyed as promptly as possible after cancellation but not later than two (2) years after cancellation. A certificate evidencing the destruction of the canceled bonds, notes and coupons shall be provided by the loan and transfer agent to the seller.

The State Treasurer shall determine and report to the State Fiscal Management Board and Legislative Budget Office by September 1 of each year the amount of money necessary for the payment of the principal of and interest on outstanding obligations for the following fiscal year and the times and amounts of the payments. It shall be the duty of the Governor to include in every executive budget submitted to the Legislature full information relating to the issuance of bonds and notes under the provisions of this chapter and the status of the Mississippi Business Investment Sinking Fund of the state for the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds and notes.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the rate of interest on any loan made using funds from the Mississippi Business Investment Fund may be negotiated by the department and shall be consistent with Section 57-61-11(b) and (c), Mississippi Code of 1972. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, the interest rate charged shall not be set such that the aggregate of the interest, penalties and other payments to the state on loans and other assistance made using funds from the Mississippi Business Investment Fund will cause the bonds issued pursuant to this chapter to be deemed arbitrage bonds pursuant to Section 103(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 and the regulations promulgated thereunder. In the case of loans initially funded from the proceeds of notes and subsequently funded from renewal bonds and notes, the interest rate to be charged on the loans shall be established in accordance with this subsection upon the sale of bonds or notes, as the case may be, for the loans. It is the intention of the Legislature that the penalties assessed for breach of program conditions imposed upon private companies shall not be treated as interest income for purposes of Section 103(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 419, § 12 1989, ch. 523, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 4, 1989).